New Jersey, session 221, A4080.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 301 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-8) is amended to read as follows: 301.      Tax imposed; rate. A tax is hereby imposed on the sale, use or possession for sale of use within this State of all cigarettes at the rate of: a.     $0.135 for each cigarette beginning on July 1, 2009, but before July 1, 2024; b.    $0.1625 for each cigarette beginning on July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025; c.     $0.175 for each cigarette beginning on July 1, 2025, but before July 1, 2026; d.    $0.1875 for each cigarette beginning on July 1, 2026, but before July 1, 2027; and e.     $0.20 for each cigarette beginning on July 1, 2027. (cf: P.L.2009, c.70, s.1) 2.    (New section)  a.  Each licensed retail dealer under P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-1 et seq.), shall, on or before September 1, 2024, September 1, 2025, September 1, 2026, and September 1, 2027, respectively, file a return under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury with the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury on forms furnished by the director, showing the amount of cigarettes in the licensed retail dealer's possession in the State at 12:01 a.m. on July 1 of each year referenced hereinabove, and shall at the time of filing that return pay the tax to the director.  Failure to obtain such forms shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a return containing the information required by the director. b. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 401 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-11) to the contrary, each licensed distributor and licensed wholesale dealer under P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-1 et seq.), shall, on or before September 1, 2024, September 1, 2025, September 1, 2026, and September 1, 2027, respectively, file a return under oath or certified under the penalties of perjury with the director on forms furnished by the director, showing the amount of cigarettes in the dealer's or wholesaler's possession in the State at the close of business prior to July 1 of each respective year referenced hereinabove.  An amount of tax shall be due equal to the additional tax on the number of cigarettes bearing stamps, and unaffixed stamps on hand.  Each licensed distributor and licensed wholesale dealer shall at the time of filing that return pay the tax to the director. Failure to obtain such forms shall not be an excuse for the failure to make a return containing the information required by the director. 3.  This act shall take effect July 1, 2024.